Utah statutes.
23-17-8.   Dog field meets.

It is lawful within the state to hold dog field meets or trials where dogs are permitted to work in exhibition or contest where the skill of dogs is demonstrated by locating or retrieving birds which have been obtained from a legal source.  Before any meet or trial is held, application shall be made in writing to the Division of Wildlife Resources, which may authorize the meet or trial under rules and regulations promulgated by the Wildlife Board.

